District of Columbia statutes.
4-204.62

Medicaid reimbursement system for nursing facilities.

(a)

The Department of Health shall develop and implement a case mix reimbursement methodology for nursing facilities. The case mix reimbursement methodology shall be effective no earlier than April 1, 2005.

(b)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement this section.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5212, 51 DCR 8441
Child support enforcement, “dependent child” and “public assistance” defined, see § 46-201.
This section is referenced in § 47-1269.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5212 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5212 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).